Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF707.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2012HV (3) 91 lh/ko H.F. 707 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 136B.6 Radon test kits ââ 1 appropriation. 2 1. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 3 June 30, 2026, and for each fiscal year thereafter, there 4 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 5 department of health and human services the amount of twenty 6 thousand dollars to be used to make radon test kits available, 7 free of charge, to homeowners and renters in the state. 8 2. The department shall distribute radon test kits through 9 the departmentâs contract with the Iowa radon awareness 10 contract recipient, a radon laboratory certified pursuant to 11 chapter 136B, or a vendor approved by the department. All 12 radon test kits shall be obtained from and analyzed by a radon 13 laboratory certified pursuant to chapter 136B. To be the 14 designated radon test kit distributor by the department, the 15 distributor must agree to provide data obtained from analysis 16 of the radon test kits to the department upon request. 17 3. The department shall provide a link on the departmentâs 18 internet site for homeowners and renters in the state to order 19 radon test kits. 20